Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2172YH (2) 91 lh/ko H.F. 607 Section 1. Section 249A.3, subsection 1, paragraph l, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 l. (1) Is an infant whose family income is not more than 3 two three hundred fifteen seventy-five percent of the federal 4 poverty level, as defined by the most recently revised income 5 guidelines published by the United States department of health 6 and human services. 7 (2) Is a pregnant woman whose family income while pregnant 8 is at or below two three hundred fifteen seventy-five percent 9 of the federal poverty level, as defined by the most recently 10 revised poverty income guidelines published by the United 11 States department of health and human services, if otherwise 12 eligible. 13 Sec. 2. MEDICAID ââ PREGNANT WOMEN ââ CONTINUOUS POSTPARTUM 14 COVERAGE ââ STATE PLAN AMENDMENTS. The department of health 15 and human services shall submit a Medicaid state plan amendment 16 to the centers for Medicare and Medicaid services of the United 17 States department of health and human services for approval in 18 accordance with sections 9812 and 9822 of the federal American 19 Rescue Plan Act of 2021, Pub. L. No. 117-2, as amended by 20 section 5113 of the federal Consolidated Appropriations Act 21 of 2023, to provide twelve months of continuous postpartum 22 eligibility under the Medicaid program to a pregnant woman 23 whose family income while pregnant is at or below three hundred 24 seventy-five percent of the federal poverty level for the 25 household size, beginning January 1, 2026. The department of 26 health and human services shall also submit a childrenâs health 27 insurance program state plan amendment to the centers for 28 Medicare and Medicaid services of the United States department 29 of health and human services to update infant eligibility 30 consistent with the provisions of this Act, beginning January 31 1, 2026. 32